Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 1. In General.
§ 65-1-127.
Participation in Federal Highway Administration Fellowship Program in Highway Safety.

The Mississippi State Highway Commission is authorized and empowered to cooperate with the Federal Highway Administration Fellowship Program in Highway Safety by granting permission of any of its employees accepted for participating in such program to be granted a leave of absence to obtain the schooling without loss of salary while gaining the advanced training to better equip them for service to the state highway department.

In addition to requirements set forth in the Federal Highway Administration’s regulations, any such employee to be eligible for such training must agree to continue to work with the Mississippi State Highway Department for at least three (3) years after completing the fellowship study period.

At no time shall more than three (3) employees be on such leave from the Mississippi State Highway Department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 332, eff from and after passage (approved March 6, 1975).

§ 65-1-129.
Security officers; definitions.

For purposes of Sections 65-1-129 through 65-1-137, unless the context requires otherwise, the following terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein:

“Highway Commission” means the Mississippi State Highway Commission.

“Qualified person” means a person who:

Has met all the educational and training requirements of a course of study prescribed and conducted by the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy; and

Is of good moral character and has not been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 65-1-131.
Security officers; appointment; oath; identification; powers; reimbursement by district.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may appoint and commission qualified persons as security officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation. Any such security officer so appointed shall be a full-time employee of the Transportation Department and shall not be employed by any privately owned guard or security service, and shall at all times be answerable and responsible to the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the Executive Director of the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

A security officer appointed and commissioned as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall, before entering upon his duties as such officer, take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, which shall be endorsed upon his commission. The commission, with the oath endorsed upon it, shall be entered in the official minute book of the Transportation Commission.

A security officer appointed and commissioned pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall, while engaged in the performance of his duties, carry on his person a badge identifying him as a security officer of the Mississippi Department of Transportation and an identification card issued by the Transportation Commission. When in uniform, each such security officer shall wear his badge in plain view.

A security officer appointed and commissioned under subsection (1) of this section may exercise the same powers of arrest and the right to bear firearms that may be exercised by any state, municipal or other police officer in this state, but only with respect to violations of law which are committed on or within buildings, property or facilities owned by or under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Commission or the Transportation Department. Any right granted under this subsection in no way relieves the requirements of appropriate affidavit and warrant for arrest from the appropriate jurisdiction and authority pursuant to the laws of this state.

On behalf of each person who is employed as a security officer under subsection (1) of this section and who is trained as a security officer at the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Training Academy, the Transportation Department shall be required to pay to the academy at least an amount equal to the per student cost of operation of said academy as tuition.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 373, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 65-1-133.
Security officers; arrest and detention.

A person arrested by a security officer appointed and commissioned under Section 65-1-131 shall be handled or processed in the jurisdiction in which the offense was committed, in the same manner as if the arrest had been made by a sheriff or constable. If such security officer detains any person arrested by him, he shall forthwith deliver the arrested person to the sheriff of the county in which the offense was committed, and such security officer shall have no further authority as to the custody of such arrested person.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 373, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 425, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 65-1-135.
Security officers; termination of authority.

The powers and authority of any security officer may be terminated at any time by the Highway Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 373, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 65-1-136.
Authorization of Mississippi Transportation Commission to contract with private security firms; requirements and limitations pertaining to private security officers.

In addition to employing security officers as full-time employees of the Mississippi Department of Transportation as authorized under subsection (1) of Section 65-1-131, the Mississippi Transportation Commission may contract with any private security firm or business authorized to do business in this state for the purpose of providing security for buildings, property or facilities owned by or under the jurisdiction of the Transportation Commission or the Transportation Department, or for buildings, property or facilities located on a trunkline highway at or near a point of entry into this state in which a welcome center or hospitality station has been established by the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development.

A security officer of a security firm or business with which the commission has contracted pursuant to the provisions of this section, while engaged in the performance of his duties, shall carry on his person a badge identifying him as a security officer and an identification card issued by the Transportation Commission. When in uniform, each such security officer shall wear his badge in plain view.

A security officer of a security firm or business with which the commission has contracted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall have only such powers of arrest as may be exercised by a private citizen of this state and only such right to bear firearms or weapons while engaged in the performance of his duties as authorized under Section 97-37-7.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 425, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 471, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2000.).

§ 65-1-137.
Security officers considered independent contractors.

All security officers of any security firm or business with which the Transportation Commission has contracted under Section 65-1-136 shall be independent contractors and shall not be considered as employees under Chapter 46 of Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 373, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 425, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 65-1-139.
Contractors may be required to provide law enforcement safety operations in certain work zones; agreements between contractors and law enforcement agencies to provide work zone law enforcement; utilization of officers from Department of Transportation Office of Law Enforcement to perform work zone safety operations under certain circumstances.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission may require its contractors to provide for law enforcement safety operations in work zones that the commission determines are on high-volume roadways or on high risk projects by including such provision in a contract between the commission and the contractor or as part of a bid requirement. A contractor may provide law enforcement work zone safety operations by entering into mutually agreeable agreements with state, county and/or municipal law enforcement agencies for the provision of such operations. Any law enforcement agency that enters into such agreement with a contractor shall only provide work zone safety operation services in locations that are within the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency, and the agency shall only have those enforcement powers granted to them by law. Contractors required to provide work zone safety operations and state law enforcement agencies, counties and municipalities are authorized to enter into agreements to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (1).

If a mutually acceptable agreement between a contractor and applicable law enforcement agencies cannot be reached after good faith negotiations, the Mississippi Transportation Commission may utilize officers from the Mississippi Department of Transportation Office of Law Enforcement to perform safety operations in work zones that the commission determines are on high-volume roadways or on high risk projects. Officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation Office of Law Enforcement are authorized to utilize any enforcement power already granted to them by law in the performance of work zone safety operations and shall engage the oscillating blue lights on their vehicles to encourage the public to observe all traffic laws while proceeding through the work zone. This subsection (2) shall not be construed as granting the Office of Law Enforcement general police powers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 65-1-141.
Annual submission of three-year plan for maintenance, construction and relocation of highway system; determination of priorities for expenditure of funds.

The Highway Commission shall annually have the Highway Department prepare a three-year plan for the maintenance, construction, reconstruction and relocation of the State Highway System. The plan shall include:

For each interstate, primary, secondary and other highway or road system under the jurisdiction of the Highway Commission, a list and detailed description of those highways, or segments thereof, on the highway system which are determined to have the highest priority for maintenance and which can be maintained within the three-year period from funds available or estimated to be made available for such purpose;

For each interstate, primary, secondary and other highway or road system under the jurisdiction of the Highway Commission, a list and detailed description of those highways, or segments thereof, on the highway system which are determined to have the highest priority for construction, reconstruction or relocation and for which contracts can be let for construction, reconstruction or relocation within the three-year period from funds available or estimated to be available for such purpose;

The reasons for the priority assigned to highways, or segments thereof, pursuant to the criteria established in the following subsection (1)(b), and the annual cost and total estimated cost of completion for each such project; and

A synopsis of any analyses or studies considered by the commission to develop the criteria in determining priorities.

The Highway Commission shall determine the criteria on which the Highway Department shall assign priority for maintenance, construction, reconstruction and relocation of highways, or segments thereof, on each highway or road system under its jurisdiction, taking into consideration all of the following criteria:

Public necessity and public safety;

Present and future economic benefit and commercial value;

Present and future traffic census; and

Route continuity.

Additionally, the Highway Commission shall take into consideration conditions potentially hazardous to the public safety at points on highways having substantial truck traffic entering and leaving the highway. In setting priorities for construction, the department shall take into consideration the construction of turning lanes at such points on highways to facilitate the safe movement of traffic.

To develop the criteria to be used in determining priorities, the State Highway Commission may conduct public hearings; shall conduct analyses or studies of highway needs, utilizing highway department personnel; and shall consider highway needs analyses or studies submitted to them by the University Research Center, which is hereby directed to develop such highway needs analyses or studies with respect to the criteria set forth in subsection (1)(b)(ii) above and to timely submit or present such analyses or studies to the State Highway Commission.

All funds appropriated and made available to the State Highway Department from any source within the state for maintenance, construction, reconstruction and relocation of the state highway system shall be expended on order of the State Highway Commission according to the priorities herein set forth and without regard to the provisions of Sections 65-3-29 through 65-3-33. The commission shall spread upon its minutes, from time to time, the priority of roads for application of such funds, the specific reasons for each priority so assigned, and the source and amount of funds applied to each project.

All interstate funds apportioned to the State Highway Commission under the Federal Aid Highway Act of 1956 shall be allocated on the basis of need to complete the interstate system of highways to provide for the maximum commercial benefit to the state.

All primary road construction money shall be used in the priorities established pursuant to subsection (1)(b) hereof.

The State Highway Department shall match all available federal money for highways.

Federal aid primary system as constituted. Priority of use of these funds shall be determined by roads meeting most of the criteria receiving priority established pursuant to subsection (1)(b) hereof.

Secondary road construction money shall be used with priorities established by roads meeting most of the following criteria receiving priority:

Roads in the order of the relative use and importance of such highways, as may be determined by the present and future traffic censuses thereof, taking into consideration their present and future use, convenience, public necessity and public safety, the connecting of Mississippi towns, cities and population centers and the economic contribution to the state should a specific highway be improved, the recorded maintenance expense and their continuity as highways through the state.

Roads which carry the most traffic.

Roads which connect the federal aid primary or interstate system in a uniform manner.

Roads which serve the most commercial value.

Roads which are arterial in nature.

Roads which connect the major rural communities with similar communities in adjoining counties.

The State Highway Department shall when funds are available match all available federal money for highways.

Projects eligible for reimbursement under the provisions of P.L. 97-424 shall be exempt from the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section, but the State Highway Commission shall expend funds available to it for such projects in the priorities established pursuant to subsection (1)(b) hereof.

All highway construction, reconstruction and relocation shall be by contract, let on competitive bid in the manner provided by statute. On any one (1) reconstruction project the total cost of which does not exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00), reconstruction may be accomplished by highway department labor, equipment or materials. Nothing herein shall be construed to affect maintenance and repair work done or to be done on existing roads. When new programs require the utilization of professional services, the Mississippi State Highway Department may contract with, engage, or retain available, competent firms actively offering such professional services as a primary source of livelihood. “Professional services” is defined as services normally performed on a fee basis or contract by engineers, architects, business management, administrative and consulting firms.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 447; § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 461; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 65-1-143.
Construction to commence at points having greatest traffic congestion.

When the specific location of a road has been established under the criteria contained in Section 65-1-141, construction on said roads shall commence at the point on each segment having the greatest traffic congestion.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 2, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-145.
Method of expenditure of funds.

The expenditure of funds now or hereafter available for the construction and reconstruction of primary and secondary roads by the Mississippi Transportation Commission, after having determined the priority in accordance with the requirements of Section 65-1-141 hereof, shall be as follows:

Four-lane roads shall be constructed using the existing two-lane roads as part of such construction along portions of highways where the most recent average daily traffic count exceeds thirty percent (30%) of the route segment’s capacity.

Along such portions of highways where the most recent average daily traffic count does not exceed thirty percent (30%) of the capacity, two-lane roads shall be constructed, or existing two (2) lanes shall be widened, overlayed and reconstructed. Along such two-lane portions of highways passing lanes may be constructed where traffic congestion or special hazards dictate, or, where such two-lane segment connects two (2) existing four-lane roads, such segment may be constructed as a four-lane road for road continuity, using the existing two-lane road as part of such construction.

Four-lane, full-control or limited access highways bypassing municipalities shall not be constructed until the Transportation Commission determines that the most recent average daily traffic count exceeds sixty percent (60%) of an existing two-lane route’s capacity or determines that within a reasonable period of time after construction of such a four-lane, full-control or limited access municipal bypass the average daily traffic count will exceed sixty percent (60%) of an existing two-lane route’s capacity. In no event shall such a bypass be constructed until approved by the Legislature by an appropriation of highway funds for a specific bypass, the construction of which has been recommended by the Executive Director of the Transportation Department pursuant to an order of the Transportation Commission duly recorded in the minutes of the commission and included in the three-year plan prepared pursuant to Section 65-1-141.

Four-lane facilities may be constructed without using existing roadways as a part of such construction where it is necessary to construct four-lanes on new location because of bad alignment of existing roadway or where it is necessary to relocate or realign such roadway so as to connect with a four-lane facility in an adjoining state.

Any four-lane bypass project of which all, or any portion thereof, is presently under construction, or let to contract, or which has been partially completed, except where right-of-way only has been acquired, may be completed in its entirety.

Notwithstanding any limitation imposed above on the construction of four-lane roads, through June 30, 2007, contracts to construct four-lane roads may be let when (i) the federal government has provided money for four-laning a specific highway project, (ii) four-laning will enhance the current economic development of the area in which the four-lane road will be constructed, or (iii) the four-lane road to be constructed will connect with an existing four-lane road.

Before a route location is submitted to the Federal Highway Administration for approval, appropriate identification of the proposed route must be spread upon the minutes of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and approved by an affirmative vote of all three (3) transportation commissioners. Where a route location has been approved by the Federal Highway Administration and a relocation of the route is contemplated, the same procedure of advertisement and hearings upon request must be followed which is used in reaching an initial route location. Any change in location must be spread upon the minutes of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and be approved by an affirmative vote of all three (3) commissioners. The Mississippi Transportation Commission may alter construction standards of an approved route by an affirmative vote of all three (3) commissioners; provided that such change is in conformity with items (a), (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f) of this subsection.

No state monies shall be expended on any construction project unless a Transportation Department engineer shall be assigned to such project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 436; Laws, 1987, ch. 322, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1987 (Governor’s veto overridden by Legislature on March 12, 1987) (See Editor’s Note below); Laws, 1994, ch. 557, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 65-1-147.
Reversion of links removed from state highway system to counties and political subdivisions.

Any link or part of the legislatively designated state highway system on July 1, 1981, that is removed from that system by appropriate statute shall revert for all purposes to the jurisdiction of the county and political subdivision in which it lies, and the link so removed may, in the discretion of the board of supervisors of the county in which it lies, be and become a part of the state aid roads system and be governed by the statutes regulating that system.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 4, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-149.
Annual reports of transportation commission; commissioner’s reports; administrative budget; post audit of funds expended and programs projected.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall file a detailed annual report with the Governor, Department of Finance and Administration, Secretary of the Senate, Clerk of the House of Representatives, and each member of the Senate and the House of Representatives requesting one, by January 15 of each year showing by county the construction and maintenance work in progress, the cost of each project with an indication of specific cost incurred and expenses paid during the fiscal year reported, a list of contracts let, a summary of the bids received, and the name and address of the contractor to whom the contract was awarded in each case. The annual report of the Transportation Commission shall also contain all receipts and disbursements during the preceding fiscal period and an estimate of the receipts for not less than the next fiscal period, plus the average cost of maintenance of each general type of road and the average cost of construction of the various types of surface. Any information and recommendations, including proposed legislation which in the opinion of the commission is needed, shall be contained in said report, in addition to any other required by law to be in the annual report of every department, agency or institution.

In addition to the report hereinabove required, there shall be presented, by January 15 of each year to the Senate Highways and Transportation Committee and to the House Transportation Committee, a report on the projected projects for the next three (3) years outlined in detail sufficient enough to facilitate an accurate assessment of such projects by such committees.

The Transportation Commission shall adopt a complete, detailed and itemized budget based on information as required by the Legislative Budget Office, which budget shall not exceed a reasonably anticipated income of the commission for the succeeding fiscal year, and the essential features of such budget shall be spread at large on the minutes of the commission. A copy of the detailed budget shall be filed with the Legislative Budget Office and the Department of Finance and Administration and shall cover all anticipated expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year. The commission shall not make expenditures in excess of its published budget or any item thereof without written notice to the Legislative Budget Office and prior approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, except in case of extraordinary, unusual or unprecedented occurrences arising by reason of unforeseen events, floods, hurricanes or other Acts of God or force majeure, in which event, upon the declaration of emergency and necessity spread at large upon the minutes, appropriate and necessary emergency expenditures may be made.

The books and accounts of the Mississippi Department of Transportation shall be audited at the end of each fiscal year by the State Auditor. A copy of the audit shall be filed with the Governor, the State Auditor, the Legislative Budget Office, the Department of Finance and Administration, and a copy kept on file in the office of the Transportation Commission. The audit should be so segregated that it shall show in detail the expenditures of the Transportation Department for the period involved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 5; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 267; Laws, 1985, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 418, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 1999.).

§ 65-1-151.
Additional bonds required of commissioners and director.

Bond shall be given to the state of Mississippi by each commissioner and the director, each in an additional sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), which is in addition to the bonds required in Sections 65-1-3 and 65-1-9, Mississippi Code of 1972; and said bond shall in all instances be and is for the same purposes and in the same manner as provided in Sections 65-1-3 and 65-1-9. Such bonds may be consolidated with bonds required in the aforementioned sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 22 sub 6, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-153.
Submission of work program required prior to appropriations; notification of changes in program.

From and after July 1, 1981, no appropriation shall be made to the Mississippi State Highway Department until the highway department supplies the legislature with a detailed program of the work to be accomplished during the fiscal year for which such appropriation will be made.

Whenever a determination is made that one or more of the projects in the program detailed in subsection (1) cannot proceed as approved, the highway department shall furnish, in prescribed written form, the reasons for any proposed deviation, cancellation or rescheduling of such project, together with its recommendation for a substitute project, to the Lieutenant Governor, the chairman of the senate appropriations committee, the chairman of the senate highways committee and the chairman of the senate finance committee, and to the speaker of the house, the chairman of the house appropriations committee, the chairman of the house ways and means committee and the chairman of the house highways and highway financing committee, and to the individual senators and representatives in whose district the requested changes along with the proposed substitution is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 464, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 65-1-155.
Transfer of funds to Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.

The State Highway Commission, acting through the Director of the State Highway Department, is hereby authorized and directed to transfer the sum of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) out of any money in the special fund accounts within the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Department into a special fund account to the credit of the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management within the State Treasury.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 303, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986 (Governor’s veto overridden by Legislature on February 13, 1986).

§ 65-1-157.
Expenditure of transferred funds by Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management.

The funds transferred herein to a special fund account to the credit of the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management shall be expended only as authorized by an act of the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 303, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986 (Governor’s veto overridden by Legislature on February 13, 1986).

§ 65-1-159.
Implementation of fund transferral by director.

The Director of the State Highway Department shall make requisition upon the State Auditor of Public Accounts, or its successor, and thereupon the Auditor of Public Accounts, or its successor, shall issue his warrant to the State Treasurer, who shall immediately pay same into the special fund account to the credit of the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management created pursuant to Section 65-1-155.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 303, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1986 (Governor’s veto overridden by Legislature on February 13, 1986).